Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.400

Repair or replacement of structurally deficient bridges.

The repair or replacement of a city, town, or county bridge deemed structurally deficient, as defined in RCW 43.21C.470, may use the contracting process available under RCW 47.28.170.

[ 2015 c 144 s 3.]